Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202286-1235
Wireline backhaul facility, defined.

Wireline backhaul facility means an above-ground or underground facility used to transport communications services from a wireless facility to a communications network.

Laws 2019, LB184, § 35.